Washington statutes.
RCW 41.08.120

Approval of payrolls.

No treasurer, auditor, comptroller or other officer or employee of any city, town or municipality in which this chapter is effective, shall approve the payment of or be in any manner concerned in paying, auditing or approving any salary, wage or other compensation for services, to any person subject to the jurisdiction and scope of this chapter, unless a payroll, estimate or account for such salary, wage or other compensation, containing the names of the persons to be paid, the amount to be paid to each such person, the services on account of which same is paid, and any other information which, in the judgment of the civil service commission, should be furnished on said payroll, bears the certificate of the civil service commission or of its secretary or other duly authorized agent, that the persons named in such payroll, estimate or account have been appointed or employed in compliance with the terms of this chapter and with the rules of the commission, and that the said payroll, estimate or account is, so far as known to the said commission, a true and accurate statement. The commission shall refuse to certify the pay of any public officer or employee whom it finds to be illegally or improperly appointed, and may further refuse to certify the pay of any public officer or employee who shall wilfully or through culpable negligence violate or fail to comply with this chapter or with the rules of the commission.

[ 1935 c 31 s 13; RRS s 9558-13.]